Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5736YH (6) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2665 DIVISION I 1 RADON MITIGATION ââ STATE BUILDING CODE 2 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 103A.8E Radon mitigation 3 requirements. 4 The commissioner shall adopt as part of the state building 5 code a requirement that new single-family or two-family 6 residential construction must include passive methods for the 7 mitigation of radon. The requirement shall only apply to 8 single-family or two-family residential construction commenced 9 after the adoption of the requirement. 10 DIVISION II 11 RADON MITIGATION SYSTEMS ââ TAX CREDITS 12 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 422.10D Radon mitigation system tax 13 credit. 14 1. For purposes of this section, âradon mitigation systemâ 15 means a system designed to mitigate the presence of radon in 16 a building installed by a person certified in accordance with 17 chapter 136B. 18 2. The taxes imposed under this subchapter, less the credits 19 allowed under section 422.12, shall be reduced by a radon 20 mitigation system tax credit equal to the amount to purchase 21 and install a radon mitigation system, not to exceed one 22 thousand dollars. 23 3. An individual may claim the tax credit allowed a 24 partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, estate, 25 or trust electing to have the income taxed directly to the 26 individual. The amount claimed by the individual shall be 27 based upon the pro rata share of the individualâs earnings of 28 the partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, 29 estate, or trust. 30 4. Any credit in excess of the taxpayerâs tax liability 31 for the tax year is not refundable but the excess for the tax 32 year may be credited to the tax liability for the following tax 33 year. 34 Sec. 3. Section 422.33, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 35 -1- LSB 5736YH (6) 91 ak/ko 1/ 5 H.F. 2665 following new subsection: 1 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. a. The taxes imposed under this 2 subchapter shall be reduced by a radon mitigation system tax 3 credit equal to the amount to purchase and install a radon 4 mitigation system, not to exceed one thousand dollars. 5 b. The taxpayer may claim the credit pursuant to this 6 subsection according to the same requirements, conditions, and 7 limitations as provided pursuant to section 422.10D. 8 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following apply 9 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 10 or after that date: 11 1. The section of this division of this Act enacting section 12 422.10D. 13 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 14 422.33. 15 DIVISION III 16 RADON MITIGATION ââ RENTAL PROPERTIES 17 Sec. 5. Section 562A.15, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. a. For purposes of this subsection, 20 âradon mitigation systemâ means a system designed to mitigate 21 the presence of radon in a building installed by a person 22 certified in accordance with chapter 136B. 23 b. A tenant may conduct a radon test or hire a person 24 certified in accordance with chapter 136B to conduct a radon 25 test in the dwelling unit. If the results of the test show a 26 radon level equal to or greater than four picocuries per liter, 27 the tenant shall provide the landlord a written copy of those 28 test results. 29 c. The landlord may have a confirmatory radon test conducted 30 by a person certified in accordance with chapter 136B and, 31 if applicable, shall provide the tenant a written copy of 32 those test results. If the confirmatory test result is 33 equal to or greater than four picocuries per liter, or if the 34 landlord chooses not to have a confirmatory test conducted, the 35 -2- LSB 5736YH (6) 91 ak/ko 2/ 5 H.F. 2665 landlord shall have a radon mitigation system installed in the 1 dwelling unit by a person certified in accordance with chapter 2 136B. Once a radon mitigation system has been installed, the 3 landlord shall have the dwelling unit retested and the landlord 4 shall provide the tenant a written copy of those new test 5 results within ninety days from the day the tenant provided 6 notification of elevated radon levels to the landlord. 7 d. If, within the ninety-day period established in paragraph 8 âbâ , the landlord fails to have a radon mitigation system 9 installed in accordance with chapter 136B after receiving 10 notice of elevated radon levels or if a radon mitigation system 11 is installed and radon test results remain equal to or greater 12 than four picocuries per liter, the tenant may terminate the 13 lease and the landlord shall return all prepaid rent and the 14 rental deposit and shall not impose any penalties against 15 the tenant. The tenant shall provide written notice to the 16 landlord of intent to terminate the lease. The termination 17 date may be effective immediately or on a later date agreed 18 to by the tenant and landlord to allow the tenant to obtain 19 alternative housing. 20 DIVISION IV 21 APPROPRIATION ââ RADON TEST KITS 22 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ RADON 23 TEST KITS. 24 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 25 to the department of health and human services for the fiscal 26 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 27 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 28 used for the purposes designated: 29 To make radon test kits available free of charge to 30 homeowners and renters in the state: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 100,000 32 2. The department shall provide a link on the departmentâs 33 internet site for homeowners and renters in the state to order 34 radon test kits. 35 -3- LSB 5736YH (6) 91 ak/ko 3/ 5 H.F. 2665